uz_Cyrl_UZ/uz_Cyrl_UZ.aff
SFX J 0 йдиганданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдигандами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдигандадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдигандада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдигандадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдигандамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдигандаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларгами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларгадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларгада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларгадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларгамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларгаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганлардандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганлардандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганларданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганлардами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганлардадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганлардада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганлардадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганлардамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганлардаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майгами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майгадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майгада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майгадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майгамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майгаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигангами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигангадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигангада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигангадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигангамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигангаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигандандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигандандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигандами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигандадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигандада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигандадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигандамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдигандаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларгами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларгадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларгада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларгадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларгамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларгаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганлардандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганлардандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганларданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганлардами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганлардадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганлардада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганлардадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганлардамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 майдиганлардаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йнингми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йнингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йнингда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йнингдирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йнингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йнингку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимни [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнинг [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнингми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнингда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнингдирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимнингку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимга [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимгами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимгадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимгада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимгадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимгамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимгаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимдан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимдандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимдандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимдами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимдадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимдада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимдадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимдамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимдаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йини [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йиними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йининг [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинингми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинингда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинингдирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йинингку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йига [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йигами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йигадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йигада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йигадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йигамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йигаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йидан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йиданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йидандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йиданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йидандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йиданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йиданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йидами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йидадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йидада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йидадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йидамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йидаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизни [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнинг [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнингми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнингда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнингдирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизнингку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизга [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизгами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизгадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизгада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизгадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизгамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизгаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимиздан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимиздандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимиздандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимизданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимиздами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимиздадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимиздада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимиздадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимиздамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йимиздаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизни [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнинг [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнингми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнингда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнингдирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизнингку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизга [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизгами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизгадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизгада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизгадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизгамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизгаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингиздан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингиздандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингиздандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингизданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингиздами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингиздадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингиздада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингиздадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингиздамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йингиздаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганнингми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганнингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганнингда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганнингдирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганнингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганнингку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимни [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнинг [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнингми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнингда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнингдирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимнингку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимга [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимгами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимгадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимгада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимгадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимгамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимгаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимдан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимдандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимдандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимдами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимдадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимдада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимдадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимдамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимдаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганини [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганиними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганининг [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинингми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинингда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинингдирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганинингку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганига [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганигами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганигадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганигада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганигадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганигамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганигаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганидан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганиданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганидандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганиданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганидандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганиданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганиданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганидами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганидадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганидада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганидадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганидамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганидаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизни [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнинг [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнингми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнингдир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнингда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнингдирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнингмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизнингку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизга [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизгами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 йдиганимизгадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
